Massachusetts, session 194th, H814.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 50 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in alphabetical position:-
“Capacity to make voting decisions independently” shall mean having the ability to
understand and appreciate the nature and consequences of voting decisions, including the
benefits and risks of and alternatives to any candidate for office, referendum question, or matter
of public affairs, and to reach an informed decision, without significant input from a caregiver
SECTION 2. The first sentence of Section 1 of Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by replacing “years” with “days” and
by removing “a person under guardianship or”
of 4

SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following:-
Section 2. A voter who lacks capacity to make voting decisions independently who
arrives willingly at a polling site with a family member may receive from this family member
any guidance, support, or executive assistance necessary to cast their ballot, except that no such
ballot may be counted if the voter informs the presiding officer that the ballot should not count.
SECTION 4. Subsection (a) of Section 4 of Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended in the first sentence, by replacing “three years”
with “one day.”
SECTION 5. Section 4 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section (e) the following subsection:-
(f) The name and address of any person under the age of 17 who so requests shall appear
on the street list.
SECTION 6. Section 4A of Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by replacing the first sentence with the following:-
During the course of the annual listing of residents, the registrars shall notify residents of
the opportunity to register themselves or their dependent family members as voters and shall
provide residents with assistance in registering themselves or their dependent family members to
vote.
SECTION 7. Section 14 of Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by replacing “years” with “days”
of 4

SECTION 8. Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, after Section 26A, the following sections:-
Section 26B. (a) The state secretary, in consultation with the commissioner of the
department of public health, the registrar of the registry of vital records and statistics, the
commissioner of early education and care, and the president of the most populous member
organization whose mission is to advance pediatric medical care, shall establish a non-partisan
baby and caregiver voter challenge program and shall promulgate regulations to implement the
program in participating birth centers, childcare centers, and pediatric medical practices in the
commonwealth; provided, however, that the regulations shall identify registration time periods
that allow eligible persons to participate in all municipal and state elections, including primary
elections.
(b) Directors of programs shall ensure that each voter challenge program implemented in
their organization provides opportunities for outreach and for all eligible voters to register to
vote, regardless of whether or not the eligible voter has a formal relationship with their
organization.
Section 26C. (a) The state secretary, in consultation with the commissioner of elementary
and secondary education, the board of elementary and secondary education, and the executive
director of the most populous member organization whose mission is to advance afterschool
programming shall establish a non-partisan voter challenge program and shall promulgate
regulations to implement the program in participating schools and afterschool or community
centers in the commonwealth; provided, however, that the regulations shall identify registration
of 4

time periods that allow eligible voters to participate in all municipal and state elections,
including primary elections.
(b) Superintendents of schools shall ensure that each voter challenge program
implemented in their districts provides opportunities for outreach and for all eligible voters to
register or pre-register to vote on any participating school or afterschool campus. An enrolled
student may apply to serve as a voter outreach coordinator or be selected to serve as a voter
outreach coordinator by a peer nomination process.
SECTION 9. Section 42 of Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by replacing “16 years” with “18 days”
SECTION 10. Section 47A of Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 11. Section 50 of Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after “commonwealth”:-
"who becomes eighteen days of age after the final time for registration under said section
twenty-six, or "
of 4